Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.09, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Financial arrangements. new text begin (a) new text end For a pupil enrolled in a course under this section, the department must make payments according to this subdivision for courses that were taken for secondary credit. new text begin (b) new text end The department must not make payments to a school district, charter school, Tribal contract school, or postsecondary institution for a course taken for postsecondary credit only. The department must not make payments to a postsecondary institution for a course from which a student officially withdraws during the first ten business days of the postsecondary institution's quarter or semester or who has been absent from the postsecondary institution for the first ten business days of the postsecondary institution's quarter or semester and is not receiving instruction in the home or hospital.new text begin If the student officially withdraws within 11 to 30 business days after the start of the postsecondary institution's quarter or semester, the department must prorate the payment to the postsecondary institution under paragraph (c), clause (1) or (2), by the ratio of the business days prior to the withdrawal to the total business days for the course. If the student enrolls in a course in the student's high school in place of a course from which the student has withdrawn, the department must pay to the student's school district or charter school the difference between the amount calculated in paragraph (c) and the prorated amount paid to the postsecondary institution.new text end new text begin (c) new text end A postsecondary institution shall receive the following: (1) for an institution granting quarter credit, the reimbursement per credit hour shall be an amount equal to 88 percent of the product of the formula allowance minus $425, multiplied by 1.2, and divided by 45; or (2) for an institution granting semester credit, the reimbursement per credit hour shall be an amount equal to 88 percent of the product of the general revenue formula allowance minus $425, multiplied by 1.2, and divided by 30. new text begin (d) new text end The department must pay to each postsecondary institution 100 percent of the amount innew text begin paragraph (c),new text end clause (1) or (2)new text begin ,new text end within 45 days of receiving initial enrollment information each quarter or semester. If changes in enrollment occur during a quarter or semester, the change shall be reported by the postsecondary institution at the time the enrollment information for the succeeding quarter or semester is submitted. At any time the department notifies a postsecondary institution that an overpayment has been made, the institution shall promptly remit the amount due. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end